Illinois, session 104th, HB918.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3960/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1151)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)8    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the the 9Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act.10(Source: P.A. 78-1156.)